Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 1

Fords

54-11-101. County legislative bodies may clear out fords.

It may be lawful for county legislative bodies to clear out fords of rivers where public roads cross the fords, upon the plans and conditions set forth in this part.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 115, § 1; Shan., § 1741; Code 1932, § 3067; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1101.

Cross-References. State highway contracts exempt from state purchasing law, § 12-3-102.

Law Reviews.

Water Rights in Tennessee (Mahlon L. Townsend), 27 Tenn. L. Rev. 557.

Comparative Legislation. Public fords, ferries, and bridges:

Ala. Code § 23-1-81 et seq.

Ark. Code § 27-85-101 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 32-1-1 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 180.010 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. § 65-21-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 234.010 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 136-72 et seq.; § 136-82 et seq.

Va. Code § 33.1-247 et seq.

Collateral References. 39 Am. Jur. 2d Highways, Streets, and Bridges § 46 et seq.

11 C.J.S. Bridges § 1 et seq.

Waters and water courses
51 et seq.

54-11-102. Reports of fords — Action of legislative body.

At the April session of the county legislative body, a majority of the members consenting, the members of each civil district in the county shall report those fords to the county mayor that they think should be cleared of obstructions, and the county legislative body shall act on each proposition separately, a majority of the county legislative body present determining whether it will receive the propositions; then, the county mayor shall report all the propositions received.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 115, § 2; Shan., § 1742; Code 1932, § 3068; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1102; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

54-11-103. Manner of clearing fords.

The fords shall be cleared of all loose rock, and all fastened rock shall be battered down that can be done by a heavy, blunt, or square-end crowbar or sledge hammer.

All other obstructions that can be conveniently removed, and all rubbish removed, shall be deposited where it will not deepen the ford of the stream.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 115, § 3; Shan., § 1743; Code 1932, § 3069; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1103.

54-11-104. Width of ford.

The width of the ford shall depend upon the use the public makes of it, but it shall not be required to be cleared over sixty feet (60') wide.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 115, § 3; Shan., § 1744; Code 1932, § 3070; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1104.

54-11-105. Advertisement of fords to be cleared.

The county clerk shall make out a list of the propositions reported by the county mayor, and give it to the sheriff, who shall immediately advertise at the different fords proposed to be cleared, or at some public place near the fords, that contracts will be given to bidders at the July session of the legislative body; provided, that a majority of the members of the county legislative body agree.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 115, § 4; Shan., § 1745; Code 1932, § 3071; impl. am. Acts 1978, §§ 7, 22, 36; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1105; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

54-11-106. Return of certificate of completion — Payment.

Each contractor shall return to the August session of the county legislative body, or some subsequent session, a certificate, with two (2) responsible freeholders signed as witnesses, that the contractor has complied with the law set forth in § 54-11-103. Then the county mayor shall issue a warrant, which shall be paid as other county claims.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 115, § 5; Shan., § 1746; Code 1932, § 3072; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 22; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1106; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.